West Virginia, session 2026, HB4507.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: Article 21.  Personal income tax. §11-21-12o.  Salaries of first responders, correctional officers, etc. exempt. Salaries received by first responders are exempt from the tax imposed by this article. First responders include:(1) Law-enforcement officers, as defined in §30-29-1of this code ;(2) Firefighters, who are members of paid fire departments, as provided for in §8-15-1 et seq. of this code;(3) Correctional officers, as provided for in §15A-3-10 of this code; and (4) Emergency medical services personnel as provided for in §16-4C-1 et seq.